Hawaii statutes.
§231-37 Neglect of duty, etc., misdemeanor.
Any officer of the department of taxation, the state director of finance, any
person duly authorized by the director of taxation, or any police officer, on
whom duties are imposed under this chapter, who wilfully fails or refuses or
neglects to perform faithfully any duty or duties of him required by this
chapter, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1932 2d, c 40, §12; RL
1935, §1915; RL 1945, §5137; am L 1945, c 79, §7; RL 1955, §115-41; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 16; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §231-37; am L 1974, c 139,
§2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next